Utah statutes.
53A-13-104.   Local school board remediation programs for secondary students.

(1)  Local school boards shall implement programs for students in the secondary schools, grades 7-12, to attain the competency levels and graduation requirements established by the State Board of Education.

(2) (a)  Local school boards shall establish remediation programs for secondary school students who do not meet competency levels in English, mathematics, science, or social studies.

(b)  Participation in the programs is mandatory for those students who fail to meet the competency levels based on classroom performance.

(3)  Students who require remediation under this section may not be advanced to the following class in subject sequences until they meet the required competency level for the subject or complete the required remediation program, except that local school boards may allow students requiring remediation who would otherwise be scheduled to enter their first year of high school to complete their remediation program during that first year.

(4) (a)  Remediation programs provided under this section should not be unnecessarily lengthy or repetitive.

(b)  A student need not repeat an entire class if remediation can reasonably be achieved through other means.

(5)  Local school boards may charge students a fee to participate in the remediation programs.

